Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1149.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3 of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 3. Authority to Control.--* * *(b.1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) or (c)(1), immediately upon approval by the United States Food and Drug Administration, the pharmaceutical composition of synthetic psilocybin shall be scheduled in a manner to coincide with Federal law, including 21 U.S.C. Ch. 13 Subch. I (relating to control and enforcement), 12345678910111213141516171819202122 regulations promulgated under 21 CFR Ch. II (relating to drug enforcement administration, Department of Justice) or any Federal judicial order. Within five business days following rescheduling by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration of the pharmaceutical composition of synthetic psilocybin, the secretary shall transmit notice of the rescheduling to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The rescheduling shall take effect thirty days after the publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1149PN1398 - 2 - 123456789101112